src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"ā:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ā:0 <=> _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM:0  ;
!# Cns*  [Vow: | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ [ ( %^StodRM:0 ) ( %^Stress2to1:0 | %^Stress1to2: | %^ConsSh: |%^PalatalizeLeft:) %^VowsRM:0 | %^VowsShIn1:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^ConsL:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %^ConsRM:0 ] [ # | %> ] ;
!!€# aʼmmā%^PalatalizeLeft%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ži
!!€0 äʼm000000ži
!!€# aʼmā%^PalatalizeLeft%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ḑi
!!€# ä0m00000ḑi
!!€# daʼdzā%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 daʼdz0000õ

! # Cns* Vow ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ [ ( %^StodRM:0 ) ( %^Stress2to1:0 ) %^VowsRM:0 | %^VowsShIn1:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^ConsL:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %^ConsRM:0 ] [ # | %> ] ;
       # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ Cns: (%^StodRM:) %^VowsRM: (%^ConsRM:) ;
!!€# maʼigāz%^StodRM%^VowsRM%^ConsRM>īst
!!€0 ma0ig000000īst

"ō:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ō:0 <=>  _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM:0 ;

"ū:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:0 <=>  _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM:0 ;
! # Cns* [Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ [ ( %^StodRM:0 ) ( %^Stress2to1:0 ) %^VowsRM:0 | %^VowsShIn1:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %^ConsRM:0 ] [ # | %> ] ;
    # Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ Cns  %^Tense:0  ;
!#Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %^ConsRM:0 %> d:

"ī:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ī:0 <=>  _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM: ;
    # Cns* _ e (ʼ:) Cns:+ (Vow:) %^Pen: %^VowsRM: ;
    # Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ Cns  %^Tense:0  ;
    # Cns* _ e %> i ;
!!€# sīe%>i
!!€# s0e0i

"a:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:0 <=>   _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM: \[ %^PalatalizeLeft: ]* [ # | %> ] ;
         Cns: _ Cns: (%^Pen: %^VV2V:) %^VowsRM: ;
!! rēnaz+N+Sg+Gen:
!!€ rēinaz^Pen^VV2V^VowsRM^ConsRM>õ
!!€ rein000000>õ

!! rōda+N+Pl+Par
!!€ rōuda^VV2V^PalatalizeLeft^VowsRM>i
!!€ rouḑ0000>i
!!€ jǭrra^VV2V^VowsRM>õ
!!€ jarr000>õ
!!€# pūol0a%^Stress1to2%^ConsL%^VowsRMõ
!!€0 pȯ0ll0000õ
!     _ (%^VV2V:) (%^PalatalizeLeft:) %^VowsRM: ; !%^Vow2Iin2: might also be good
!!€# kǟnga%^VV2V%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRMi
!!€0 keņg0000i

"e:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 e:0 <=> _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM: ;
!!€ tīʼe%^VOWLower%^StodRM%^VowsRM%>šti
!!€ tē000000šti
      _ Cns: %^ĪE2Ē: ;
!! kēļ+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kīel^ĪE2Ē^PalatalizeLeft
!!€ kē0l00

"{õØ}:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
%{õØ%}:0 <=>
       _ [l:|ļ:|r:|n:] õ: Dummy:* %^Pen: %^VowsRM: ;

"õ:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
õ:0 <=> _ (Cns:) (%^Pen: %^ConsRM:) (%^Pen: %^VowsRM:)  DummyNoPen:* %^VowsRM: ;
!        _ Cns: Vow: %^Pen: %^VowsRM: ;
!!€# kittõ%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>dõd
!!€0 kit00000tõd
!          Vow %> _ [ d | n | k s | s t ] ;

"i:0 in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
i:0 <=> # Cns:* [ ē | ǭ | ū ] _ Cns:+ ( Vow: ) %^U2ZERO:0 ;
        # Cns:* [ ē | ǭ | ū ] _ Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen: %^U2ZERO:0 ;
        # Cns:* _ e (ʼ:) Cns:+ (:Cns) ( Vow: ) %^Pen: %^VowsRM: ; 
        # Cns:* Vow: (i: | u:) Cns:+ _ Cns:+ (%^Pen: %^VV2V:) %^VowsRM: ;
	_ %^UltRmVow: ;
# Cns* [ e: | ȯ: (:) ] _ :Cns+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!  # Cns* [ e: | ȯ: (0:) ] _ :Cns+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ; 
!!€# leiba%^VowsLI1%>st
!!€0 lē0ba00st
!! līti+A+Der/Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ līti^UltRmVow>õm
!!€ līt00>õm
 # Cns:* Vow:+ (ʼ:) (Vow:) Cns:+ (:Cns) _ (%^StodRM:) (%^CC2C:) %^VowsRM: ;
 # Cns:* Vow:+ (ʼ:) [ CnsWithStod :0* | i g | Cns:+ Cns: ] _ (%^StodRM:) (%^ConsSh:) %^VowsRM: ;
         # Cns* e: _ %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# tei%^VowsLI1%>ḑi
!!€0 tē000ḑi
         Vow: _ j Vow: %^ConsSh: ;
!!€# lǭija%^ConsSh
!!€0 lǭ0ja0
       # Cns*  _ e (ʼ:) Cns:+ (Vow: ) %^VV2V:  ;
!!€# liestā%^VowShIn1%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>i
!!€0 l0ešt00000i
       # Cns* Vow: _ s: k Vow: %^ConsSh: ;
!!€# ūiska%^ConsSh
!!€0 ū0ška0

"u:0 in second position of first-syllable diphthong"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
u:0 <=>
# Cns:* [ ȭ: |ǟ: | ō: | ī e] _ Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen: %^U2ZERO: ;
# Cns:* [ ȭ: | ǟ: | ō: | ī e]  _ Cns:+ ( Vow: ) %^U2ZERO:0 ;
# Cns:* [ õ: | ȭ: | ä: | o: ]  _ Cns:+ ( Vow: ) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€ tǟutõ^PEN^U2ZERO^VowsRM>a>m
!!€ tǟ0t0000>a>m
!!€# ouki%^VowsLI1z
!!€0 ō0ki0z
         Vow: _ v Vow: %^ConsSh: ;
!!€# pǟuva%^ConsSh
!!€0 pǟ0va0
    # Cns* _ (ʼ:) Cns:+ (Vow:) %^Pen: %^VowsRM: ;
!! lum+N+Sg+Par:  **snow/lumi**
!!€ luʼm^Pen^VowsRM^StodRM^ConsRMūn    
!!€ l0000000ūn    

"o:0 in second position of first-syllable diphthong"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!! ```
o:0 <=> # [p|m|v]* [ ū: ]  _ (i) Cns:+ (:Cns) (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 |%^VV2V:] ;
 # [p|m|v]* [ ū: ]  _ (i) Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen:0 %^VV2V: ;
!!€# pūol0a%^Stress1to2%^ConsL
!!€# pȯ0llõ00
!! ```

!! ### Zero to vowel


"0:õ in vowel metathesis"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
0:õ <=> [ b | d | t | g ] _ [ l | r ] õ: %^VowsMetath:0 %^VowsRM:0  ;


!! ## Consonant rules

!! ### Consonant loss 
"shorten consonantism between 1st and 2nd vowel center jeʼllõ:jelāb"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 Cx:0 <=> 
# Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: ) Cx _ (Vow:) [%^VOWLower:|%^VV2V:|%^U2ZERO:|%^StodRM:|%^VV2V:]* [%^ConsSh:0|%^CC2C:] \[ %^DePal: ]* [.#. | %> ] ;
        Cns _ Vow: Cns:  (%^Pen: %^VV2V:) %^Pen: [%^ConsRM:0|%^CC2C:] ;
          where Cx in ( b j ļ n ņ r ŗ v ž ) ;
!!€# aʼmmā%^PalatalizeLeft%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ži
!!€0 äʼm000000ži

"g:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 g:0 <=>
# Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) Cns: _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) [%^ConsSh:0|%^CC2C:|%^ConsRM:]  ;
  _ (%^VowsLI1:) (%^StodRM:) (%^VowsRM:) %^ConsRM: ;
   g _ %{õØ%}: [l|ļ|r|n] Vow: %^Pen: %^ConsRM: ;

"l:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 l:0 <=>
# Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: ) l _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) (%^VV2V:) [%^ConsSh:0|%^CC2C:]  ;
  _ (%^VowsLI1:|%^VV2V:) (%^StodRM:) (%^VowsRM:) [%^ConsRM:|%^CC2C:] ;

"m:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 m:0 <=>
    m _ %{õØ%}: [l|ļ|r|n] Vow: %^Pen: %^ConsRM: ;
  # Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: ) m _ Vow: Dummy:* [%^ConsSh:0|%^CC2C:]  ;
  Vow: ( ʼ: ) _ Dummy:* %^ConsRM:  ;
  
"z:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 z:0 <=>
# Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: ) Cns: _ Vow: (%^VV2V:) ( %^StodRM:0 ) [%^ConsSh:0|%^CC2C:] ;
  _ ( %^Pen: %^VV2V: | %^Stress2to1: | %^VV2V: | %^ĪE2Ē:) ( %^StodRM: ) ( %^VowsRM: ) %^ConsRM: ;
  z _ %{õØ%}: [l|ļ|r|n] Vow: %^Pen: %^ConsRM: ;
!! rēnaz+N+Sg+Gen:
!!€ rēinaz^Pen^VV2V^VowsRM^ConsRM>õ
!!€ rein000000>õ
!!€  rik0āz%^Stress2to1%^ConsRM
!0  rikkõ000

!! ### Consonant lengthening

!! Lengthening consonantism between first and second vowel center
!! simultaneous to reducing vowel of second syllable


!"0:p"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
! 0:p <=> Vow: p _ Vow: %^ConsL: ;
!!!€ käp0ā^ConsL^LongV2Õin2
!!!€ käppõ00

!"0:s"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
! 0:s <=> Vow: s _ (Vow:) %^ConsL: ;
!!!€ mis0^ConsL>õst
!!!€ miss0>õst

"%{XC%}:Cx"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 %{XC%}:Cx <=> 
!# Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) Cx _ Vow: [ ( %^Stress1to2:0 ) %^ConsL:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 ] 
               :Cx  _ ;
!  # Cns* [ a | ä | e | õ | u | i ] ( ʼ: ) Cx _ [ %> õ | %> i ] ;
         where Cx in (t b d g j l ļ m n ņ r ŗ š v z ) ;

"%{XC%}:p"
!! **@RULENAME@** 2014-02-27
 %{XC%}:p <=> p _ %> ;
!!€# kep%{XC%}>õ
!!€0 kepp0õ

"%{XC%}:s"
!! **@RULENAME@** 2020-10-21
 %{XC%}:s <=> s _ %> ;
!! tas+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ tas{XC}>õ
!!€ tass>õ

"%{XC%}:ž"
!! **@RULENAME@** 2014-02-27
 %{XC%}:ž <=>
  # Cns* [ a | ä | õ | u | i | e ] ( ʼ: ) :ž (%^D2Ž:) _ [ %> õ |  %> i ] ;
! :ž _ %> ;
!!€# veʼd%^D2Ž%{XC%}>i
!!€0 veʼž0ž0i

!"%{XC%}:š"
!!! __@RULENAME@__ 2014-01-18 "%{XC%}:Cx" not working
! %{XC%}:š <=> š _ %> ;

"%{XC%}:k"
!! **@RULENAME@** 2014-02-27
 %{XC%}:k <=> k _ %> ;
!!€# rok%{XC%}>õ
!!€0 rokk0õ

"Stod removal left"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 ʼ:0 <=> Vow: _ \[ .#. | # ]* %^StodRM:0 ;
 ! comment: 2020-10-21: without surrounding full stops, # is the character used in the stem
!  # Cns* :0* Vow _ [ CnsWithStod Cns:* [ :0* | Vow: z: ]| [ i | u ] g (Vow: Cns:) | o Cns ] ( Vow: | ū: Cns: ) %^StodRM:0 ; 
!!€# daʼdzā%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 daʼdz0000õ
!! aʼb#sõʼnā+N+Sg+Nom: 
!!€ aʼb#sõʼn%^StodRMā
!!€ aʼb#sõ0n0ā
!"Stod removal right"
!!! __@RULENAME@__  
! ʼ:0 =>  Vow: _ \[ .#. ]* %^StodRM:0 ;
!# Cns* :0* Vow _ [ CnsWithStod Cns:* :0* | [ i | u ] g (Vow: Cns:) | o Cns ] (Vow: | ū: Cns: ) %^StodRM:0 ; 
! 2013-06-26 for looser voikko stød can disappear everywhere 
! _ ; a filter does this removal 2015-06-17

! Vow _ CnsWithStod: ( :CnsWithStod )  Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> | %^VowsRM:0  %> ] ;
!# Cns* :Vow _ :CnsWithStod+  Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> | %^VowsRM:0  %> ] ;
!!€# ka0l0ā%^Stress2to1
!!€0 kaʼllõ0

!# Cns* Vow ( 0: ) :Cns+ _ %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> ] ;
!# Cns* :Vow _  CnsStrengthening Vow: %^Stress2to1:0  [ # | %> | %^VowsRM:0  %> ] ;
!         # Cns* :Vow _ [ g: | d: | l: ] Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0  %^ConsRM:0  ;
!         # Cns* :Vow _ [ g: | d: | l: ] Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %> [ ḑ i | ž i | š t i ] ;

"z:ž"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 z:ž <=> Vow: (ʼ:) (v) _ (Vow:0|t) (%^StodRM:) (%^Õ2I:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ; !!
   _ z: Vow: (%^VV2V:) (%^CC2C:) %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# alīz%^PalatalizeLeft%>i
!!€0 alīž00i
!!€# izā%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>ḑi
!!€# iž0000ḑi

"d:ḑ"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
d:ḑ <=>
      Vow: (ʼ:| ʼ: Vow:) _ (Vow:) (%^ĪE2Ē:) (%^VOWRaise:|%^VV2V:) (%^StodRM:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 \[ %^D2Ž: ]* [ # | %> ] ; !! lēʼḑ:līʼed 147
!! rōda+N+Pl+Par
!!€ rōuda^VV2V^PalatalizeLeft^VowsRM>i
!!€ rouḑ0000>i

"ļ:l"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ļ:l <=> _ Vow: (%^Pen: %^ConsRM:) (%^Pen: %^VowsRM:) %^DePal:0 ;

"l:ļ"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
l:ļ <=> _ Vow: (%^Pen: %^VowsRM:) %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
        _ Vow: (%^Stress2to1:0) %^VowsRM:0 ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> [ ḑ i | ž i | š t i ] ;
        _ m Vow: (%^Stress1to2:|%^VV2V:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ( %^VowsRM:0 ) [ # | %> ] ;
        _ ( g |%{XC%}: ) (%^VowsLI1:|%^VV2V:) (%^StodRM:|%^Õ2I:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ( %^VowsRM:0 ) ( %^ConsRM:0 ) [ # | %> ] ;!kiļg:kilg
!! This rule should not require the %^ConsRM:0 trigger, but for now this makes it work.
	_ (%^ĪE2Ē:) (%^StodRM:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ; !! kēļ:kēl 215
!!€# äʼddõl%^PalatalizeLeft%>i
!!€0 äʼddiļ00i
!!€# tuʼl%^StodRM%^PalatalizeLeft%>īž
!!€# tu0ļ000īž

"n:ņ palatalization"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
n:ņ <=> _ Cns:* ( Vow: ) (%^VowsSh1:|%^VV2V:| %^VV2V:) (%^VOWRaise:|%^Õ2I:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ( %^VowsRM:0 | %^Vow2Iin2:) [ # | %> ] ;
!!€# Vē0na%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRMõ
!!€0 Vein000õ
!!€# ǭʼrõn%^PalatalizeLeft
!!€0 ǭʼriņ0
       _ t s: Vow: %^VV2V: %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# vȱntsa%^VV2V%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>ti
!!€0 vȯņtš00000ti
        _ (%{XC%}:) (%^ĪE2Ē:|%^VV2V:) (%^StodRM:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ; !! sēņ:sēn 220
       _ g ( Vow: ) (%^VV2V:) %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# kǟnga%^VV2V%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRMi
!!€0 keņg0000i
   

"r:ŗ"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
r:ŗ <=> _ (%^VV2V:|%^Pen: %^VowsRM:) (%^VOWRaise:) (%^StodRM:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ; !! jūŗ:jūr 221
       _ [g|m|d:] ( Vow: ) ( %^VV2V: ) (%^VOWRaise:) %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# ǟrga^VV2V^VOWRaise^PalatalizeLeft^VowsRMi
!!€0 eŗg0000i


! First syllable short second syllable long
! jellõ: jelāb
!"shorten first syllable jellõ: jelāb"
! Cx:0 <=> Cx _ %^1Sh2L:0 ;
!          Cx _ %^ConsRM:0 ;
!          where Cx in ( d g l ļ n p ŗ ) ;

"d:t"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
d:t <=>
       Vow: ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) [ s k: | d d: | t t: | k k:  | t s | n d | ŗ š t: | r t: | :u [ t: | d ] ] (Vow:) ( %^ConsSh:0 |%^Stress1to2:) %^VowsRM:0 ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> _ õ d ;
!!€# kittõ%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>dõd
!!€0 kit00000tõd
       [ ž | :z | :s | :š ] %> _ ; !! nominative plural 
       _ (%^PreI:) (%^StodRM:) %^D2T:  ;
!!€# v0eʼd%^PreI%^StodRM%^D2T
!!€0 vie0t

"d:ț"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
d:ț <=> [ ț: ] Vow: ( %^ConsSh:0 ) %^VowsRM:0  ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> _ õ d ;

"d:ž"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
d:ž <=>
       :Vow ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) Cns:* _ (%^VV2V: %^PalatalizeLeft:|%^PreI:|%^VOWRaise:|%^Pen: %^VowsRM:) (%^StodRM:) (%^VowsLI1:) %^D2Ž:0 ;

!"ž:d "
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! ž:d <=>
!       :Vow Cns:* _ (%^VowsLI1:|%^StodRM) %^Ž2D:0 ;



!! ### Rules for consonant loss
